Utah statutes.
67-19-33.   Controlled substances and alcohol use prohibited.

An employee may not:

(1)  manufacture, dispense, possess, use, distribute, or be under the influence of a controlled substance or alcohol during work hours or on state property except where legally permissible;

(2)  manufacture, dispense, possess, use, or distribute a controlled substance or alcohol if the activity prevents:

(a)  state agencies from receiving federal grants or performing under federal contracts of $25,000 or more; or

(b)  the employee to perform his services or work for state government effectively as regulated by the rules of the executive director in accordance with Section 67-19-34; or

(3)  refuse to submit to a drug or alcohol test under Section 67-19-36.

